Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 8. Sale and Labeling of Eggs

§§ 35-7-801 through 35-7-808.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions regulating food industry, see §

35-7-123

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1939, ch. 93, § 6 and Laws 1957, ch. 30, §§ 1 through 9, related to the sale and labeling of eggs.